Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5034.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-46-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-46 entitled "Open
Meetings" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-46-6. Notice.
(a) All public bodies shall give written notice of their regularly scheduled meetings at the
beginning of each calendar year. The notice shall include the dates, times, and places of the
meetings and shall be provided to members of the public upon request and to the secretary of state
at the beginning of each calendar year in accordance with subsection (f).
(b) Public bodies shall give supplemental written public notice of any meeting within a
minimum of forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and state holidays in the count of hours,
before the date. This notice shall include the date the notice was posted; the date, time, and place
of the meeting; and a statement specifying the nature of the business to be discussed. Copies of the
notice shall be maintained by the public body for a minimum of one year. Nothing contained herein
shall prevent a public body, other than a school committee, from adding additional items to the
agenda by majority vote of the members. School committees may, however, add items for
informational purposes only, pursuant to a request, submitted in writing, by a member of the public
during the public comment session of the school committee’s meetings. Said informational items
may not be voted upon unless they have been posted in accordance with the provisions of this
section. Such additional items shall be for informational purposes only and may not be voted on
except where necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action to

protect the public or to refer the matter to an appropriate committee or to another body or official.
(c) Written public notice shall include, but need not be limited to, posting a copy of the
notice at the principal office of the public body holding the meeting, or if no principal office exists,
at the building in which the meeting is to be held, and in at least one other prominent place within
the governmental unit, and electronic filing of the notice with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f); however, nothing contained herein shall prevent a public body from holding an
emergency meeting, upon an affirmative vote of the majority of the members of the body when the
meeting is deemed necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action
to protect the public. If an emergency meeting is called, a meeting notice and agenda shall be posted
as soon as practicable and shall be electronically filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f) and, upon meeting, the public body shall state for the record and minutes why the
matter must be addressed in less than forty-eight (48) hours in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section and only discuss the issue or issues that created the need for an emergency meeting.
Nothing contained herein shall be used in the circumvention of the spirit and requirements of this
chapter.
(d) Nothing within this chapter shall prohibit any public body, or the members thereof,
from responding to comments initiated by a member of the public during a properly noticed open
forum even if the subject matter of a citizen’s comments or discussions were not previously posted,
provided such matters shall be for informational purposes only and may not be voted on except
where necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action to protect the
public or to refer the matter to an appropriate committee or to another body or official. Nothing
contained in this chapter requires any public body to hold an open-forum session to entertain or
respond to any topic nor does it prohibit any public body from limiting comment on any topic at
such an open-forum session. No public body, or the members thereof, may use this section to
circumvent the spirit or requirements of this chapter.
(e) A school committee may add agenda items not appearing in the published notice
required by this section when the item(s) added are for the purposes of discussion only and not for
the purpose of voting upon that item(s) or under the following conditions:
(1) The revised agenda is electronically filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f), and is posted on the school district’s website and the two (2) public locations
required by this section at least forty-eight (48) hours in advance of the meeting in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section;
(2) The new agenda items were unexpected and could not have been added in time for
newspaper publication;
LC000321 - Page 2 of 4

(3) Upon meeting, the public body states for the record and minutes why the agenda items
could not have been added in time for newspaper publication and need to be addressed at the
meeting;
(4) A formal process is available to provide timely notice of the revised agenda to any
person who has requested that notice, and the school district has taken reasonable steps to make the
public aware of this process; and
(5) The published notice shall include a statement that any changes in the agenda will be
posted on the school district’s website and the two (2) public locations required by this section and
will be electronically filed with the secretary of state at least forty-eight (48) hours in advance of
the meeting in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(f) All notices required by this section to be filed with the secretary of state shall be
electronically transmitted to the secretary of state in accordance with rules and regulations that shall
be promulgated by the secretary of state. This requirement of the electronic transmission and filing
of notices with the secretary of state shall take effect one year after this subsection takes effect.
(g) If a public body fails to transmit notices in accordance with this section, then any
aggrieved person may file a complaint with the attorney general in accordance with § 42-46-8.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000321
========
LC000321 - Page 3 of 4